Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB569.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE I-MSNOW AND ICE REMOVAL SAFETY GRANT PROGRAMSection 101-M. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Account." The Snow and Ice Removal Safety Grant Program Account established under section 103-M(a)."Applicant." A person that applies for a grant award under the program."Department." The Department of Transportation of the Commonwealth."Eligible applicant." An applicant who is eligible to receive a grant award under the program."Motor carrier vehicle." Any of the following:(1) A truck, truck tractor or combination of a truck and truck tractor having a gross vehicle weight rating, gross combination weight rating, registered gross weight, registered combination weight or actual gross weight of 17,001 pounds or more.(2) A truck, truck tractor or combination of a truck and truck tractor engaged in interstate commerce and having a gross vehicle weight rating, gross combination weight rating, registered gross weight, registered combination weight or 20250SB0569PN0580 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728293031 actual gross weight of 10,001 pounds or more."Program." The Snow and Ice Removal Safety Grant Program established under section 102-M(a)."Snow and ice removal device." Any apparatus, equipment or technology used to remove snow and ice from the roof of a motor carrier vehicle.Section 102-M. Snow and Ice Removal Safety Grant Program.(a) Establishment.--The Snow and Ice Removal Safety Grant Program is established within the department for the purpose of developing snow and ice removal devices at locations across this Commonwealth. The department shall award a grant under the program to an eligible applicant for the purpose of funding the purchase, installation or utilization of snow and ice removal devices at locations across this Commonwealth.(b) Use of money.--(1) A recipient of a grant award under the program shall use the grant money to purchase, install or utilize a snow and ice removal device that will remove snow and ice from motor carrier vehicles at a location in this Commonwealth.(2) A recipient of a grant award under the program shall use the grant money to purchase, install or utilize a snow and ice removal device at a location that is convenient and easily accessible to motor carrier vehicles, including a service area, a weigh station, an inspection facility, a port, a terminal or another intermodal transportation facility.(3) A recipient of a grant award under the program may use the grant money to cover other direct costs related to a snow and ice removal device for a project approved by the department.20250SB0569PN0580 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Operation and fees.--(1) A recipient of a grant award under the program shall operate a snow and ice removal device at a location in accordance with regulations promulgated by the department under section 109-M.(2) A recipient of a grant award under the program may charge a user fee for the use of a snow and ice removal device to pay for the costs associated of operating and maintaining the associated facilities and equipment.(d) Award limits.--Subject to the availability of grant money for the program, the department may not provide a grant award to an eligible applicant in excess of $50,000 per snow and ice removal device location or $150,000 for all snow and ice removal device locations.Section 103-M. Snow and Ice Removal Safety Grant Program Account.(a) Establishment.--The Snow and Ice Removal Safety Grant Program Account is established as an account in the General Fund. Money in the account is appropriated on a continuing basis to the department for the purposes specified under subsection (c).(b) Deposits.--Notwithstanding 42 Pa.C.S. § 3571 (relating to Commonwealth portion of fines, etc.), money collected under 75 Pa.C.S. § 3721 (relating to snow and ice) shall be deposited into the account.(c) Use of money.--The department shall use the money deposited into the account under subsection (b) only for the following purposes:(1) Establishing the program to provide incentives to eligible applicants to purchase, install and utilize snow and 20250SB0569PN0580 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ice removal devices for motor carrier vehicles at locations across this Commonwealth.(2) Offsetting costs associated with a public awareness campaign related to snow and ice removal. The department may use no more than 3% of the annual account balance for the purpose specified under this paragraph.(3) Offsetting the administrative costs of the program. The department may use no more than 3% of the annual account balance for the purpose specified under this paragraph.Section 104-M. Application form.The department shall develop an application form for an applicant to apply for grant awards under the program. The form shall include all of the following information:(1) The name, address and contact information of the applicant.(2) The amount of grant money requested.(3) The proposed use for the grant award.(4) Any other information the department deems necessary.Section 105-M. Notice of availability and award of grants.The department shall provide information regarding the availability and award of grant money under the program on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 106-M. Award of grants.(a) Determination.--Within 60 days of the submission and review of an application for a grant award under the program, the department shall determine the applicant's eligibility for the grant money. Upon approving the application, the department shall award a grant amount to the eligible applicant in accordance with section 102-M(d).20250SB0569PN0580 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Notice.--The department shall provide the following written notice to an applicant:(1) The amount of the grant money awarded under the program, if any, and the conditions or restrictions on the use of the grant money.(2) If part or all of the application is denied, the reason for the full or partial denial.(c) Other information.--If the department requests additional information from an applicant for the purpose of reviewing an application for a grant award under the program, the applicant shall immediately provide the additional information to the department.Section 107-M. Transfer.Notwithstanding section 1703-A, the sum of $2,000,000 is transferred from the Budget Stabilization Reserve Fund to the account.Section 108-M. Report.No later than December 31, 2026, the department shall publish a report that lists each recipient of a grant award under the program and a recipient's application information on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 109-M. Regulations.The department shall promulgate regulations necessary to implement this article.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0569PN0580 - 6 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425